Missouri, session 2026, HB3344.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.513, to read as follows:
9.513. March twelfth each year is hereby designated as "Charlie Parker Day" in
2 Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
3 and activities to celebrate the life and contributions of Charlie Parker, an influential
4 saxophonist, band leader, and composer who was also a leading figure in the
5 development of bebop.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.